District of Columbia statutes.
19-1301.04

Knowledge.

(a)

Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a person has knowledge of a fact if the person:

(1)

Has actual knowledge of it;

(2)

Has received a notice or notification of it; or

(3)

From all the facts and circumstances known to the person at the time in question, has reason to know it.

(b)

An organization that conducts activities through employees has notice or knowledge of a fact involving a trust only from the time the information was received by an employee having responsibility to act for the trust, or would have been brought to the employee’s attention if the organization had exercised reasonable diligence. An organization exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the employee having responsibility to act for the trust and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence does not require an employee of the organization to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual knows a matter involving the trust would be materially affected by the information.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 104 of the Uniform Trust Code.